District of Columbia statutes.
28-2503

Action on bond to United States — Interest by private person.

When a bond is executed to the United States by a fiduciary or public officer, conditioned for the performance of certain duties, in the performance of which private persons are interested, a person aggrieved by a breach of the condition may maintain an action thereon in his own name against the obligor and his sureties to recover damages for the injury suffered by him in consequence of the breach. The custodian of the bond shall furnish a certified copy thereof to the party for that purpose on payment of the legal fees therefor.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 670, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-2503.
1973 Ed., § 28-2503.